California, session 20252026, SB485.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27703 of the Government Code is amended to read:27703. (a) If the public defender of a county is to be appointed, they shall be appointed by the board of supervisors. The public defender of two or more counties shall be appointed by the boards of supervisors of those counties.(b) A public defender appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) may be removed from office by the board of supervisors by a three-fifths vote for neglect of duty, malfeasance or misconduct in office, or other good cause.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not be construed to exempt a public defender from a county’s established performance evaluation process for appointed department heads.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.